Illinois, session 104th, HB2519.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Civic Center Code is amended by changing 5Section 280-80 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 200/280-80)7    Sec. 280-80. Contracts; bidding. All contracts for the 8sale of property of the value of more than the small purchase 9maximum under Section 20-20 of the Illinois Procurement Code 10$10,000 or for any concession in or lease of property of the 11Authority for a term of more than one year shall be awarded to 12the highest responsible bidder, after advertising for bids. 13All construction contracts and contracts for supplies, 14materials, equipment and services, when the expense thereof 15will exceed the small purchase maximum under Section 20-20 of 16the Illinois Procurement Code $10,000, shall be let to the 17lowest responsible bidder, after advertising for bids 18excepting (1) when repair parts, accessories, equipment or 19services are required for equipment or services previously 20furnished or contracted for; (2) when the nature of the 21services required is such that competitive bidding is not in 22the best interest of the public, including, without limiting 23the generality of the foregoing, the services of accountants,   HB2519- 2 -LRB104 07680 RTM 17724 b1architects, attorneys, engineers, physicians, superintendents 2of construction, and others possessing a high degree of skill; 3and (3) when services such as water, light, heat, power, 4telephone or telegraph are required.5    All contracts involving less than the small purchase 6maximum under Section 20-20 of the Illinois Procurement Code 7$10,000 shall be let by competitive bidding whenever possible, 8and in any event in a manner calculated to ensure the best 9interests of the public.10    Competitive bidding is not required for the lease of real 11estate or buildings owned or controlled by the Authority on 12July 13, 1982 (the effective date of Public Act 82-786). The 13Board is empowered to offer such leases upon such terms as it 14deems advisable.15    In determining the responsibility of any bidder, the Board 16may take into account the past record of dealings with the 17bidder, the bidder's experience, adequacy of equipment, and 18ability to complete performance within the time set, and other 19factors besides financial responsibility, but in no case shall 20any such contracts be awarded to any other than the highest 21bidder (in case of sale, concession or lease) or the lowest 22bidder (in case of purchase or expenditure) unless authorized 23or approved by a vote of at least three-fourths of the members 24of the Board, and unless such action is accompanied by a 25statement in writing setting forth the reasons for not 26awarding the contract to the highest or lowest bidder, as the   HB2519- 3 -LRB104 07680 RTM 17724 b1case may be, which statement shall be kept on file in the 2principal office of the Authority and open to public 3inspection.4    From the group of responsible bidders the lowest bidder 5shall be selected in the following manner: to all bids for 6sales the gross receipts of which are not taxable under the 7"Retailers' Occupation Tax Act", approved June 28, 1933, as 8amended, there shall be added an amount equal to the tax which 9would be payable under said Act, if applicable, and the lowest 10in amount of said adjusted bids and bids for sales the gross 11receipts of which are taxable under said Act shall be 12considered the lowest bid; provided, that, if said lowest bid 13relates to a sale not taxable under said Act, any contract 14entered into thereon shall be in the amount of the original bid 15not adjusted as aforesaid.16    Contracts shall not be split into parts involving 17expenditures of less than the small purchase maximum under 18Section 20-20 of the Illinois Procurement Code $10,000 for the 19purposes of avoiding the provisions of this Section, and all 20such split contracts shall be void. If any collusion occurs 21among bidders or prospective bidders in restraint of freedom 22of competition, by agreement to bid a fixed amount or to 23refrain from bidding or otherwise, the bids of such bidders 24shall be void. Each bidder shall accompany his bid with a sworn 25statement that he has not been a party to any such agreement.26    Members of the Board, officers and employees of the   HB2519- 4 -LRB104 07680 RTM 17724 b1Authority, and their relatives within the fourth degree of 2consanguinity by the terms of the civil law, are forbidden to 3be interested directly or indirectly in any contract for 4construction of maintenance work or for the delivery of 5materials, supplies or equipment.6    The Board shall have the right to reject all bids and to 7readvertise for bids. If after any such advertisement no 8responsible and satisfactory bid, within the terms of the 9advertisement, shall be received, the Board may award such 10contract, without competitive bidding, provided that it shall 11not be less advantageous to the Authority than any valid bid 12received pursuant to advertisement.13    The Board shall adopt rules and regulations to carry into 14effect the provisions of this Section.15(Source: P.A. 93-491, eff. 1-1-04.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.